Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1 CERTIFICATES OF TITLE
42-6-110.5. Certificates of title - arrangements for transfer of title upon death - beneficiary designation forms - definitions.

On and after August 10, 2016, the division shall make available a beneficiary designation form that allows the owner or joint owners of a vehicle to arrange for the transfer of the vehicle's title to a named beneficiary upon the death of the owner or upon the death of all joint owners of the vehicle. At a minimum, the form must include fields for the following information:

The manufacturer, model, year, and vehicle identification number of the vehicle;

The name of the owner or every joint owner of the vehicle;

The words "transfer on death to", or the abbreviation "TOD", followed by the name of the beneficiary; and

The signature of the owner of the vehicle or of each joint owner of the vehicle.

Repealed.

The division shall make beneficiary designation forms available:

In each office of the division that is open to the public for conducting business relating to motor vehicles and drivers' licenses; and

On the division's public website.

Upon the death of the owner, or of the last surviving joint owner, of a vehicle for which a beneficiary designation form has been properly executed, as described in subsection (1)(a) of this section, the beneficiary shall present the form to the division and request a new title of ownership of the vehicle in the beneficiary's name. The form must be accompanied by:

(I) Proof of the death of the vehicle's owner or proof of the death of the last surviving joint owner of the vehicle; and

(II) The fee for an application for a certificate of title, as described in section 42-6-137 (1).

Upon the presentation of a properly executed beneficiary designation form and accompanying documents, as described in subsection (2)(a) of this section, the division, subject to any security interest, shall issue a new certificate of title to the beneficiary. For the purposes of this subsection (2)(b), the division may rely on a death certificate, record, or report that constitutes prima facie evidence of death.

(2.4) The personal representative, as defined in section 15-10-201 (39), of the estate of a deceased vehicle owner is not liable for obtaining a new certificate of title or for transferring title to the vehicle if the personal representative does not have actual knowledge of the existence of a valid, unrevoked beneficiary designation form.

(2.6) A successor, as defined in section 15-10-201 (51), of a decedent, or a person acting on behalf of a successor, is not liable for obtaining a new certificate of title or transferring title to the vehicle by an affidavit executed in accordance with section 15-12-1201 if the person does not have actual knowledge of the existence of a valid, unrevoked beneficiary designation form.

During the lifetime of the owner of a vehicle for which a beneficiary designation form has been properly executed or before the death of the last surviving joint owner of such a vehicle:

The signature or consent of the beneficiary is not required for any transaction relating to the vehicle; and

The owner or surviving joint owners of the vehicle may revoke the beneficiary designation form or change the beneficiary of the beneficiary designation form at any time by:

Selling the vehicle with proper assignment and delivery of the certificate of title to another person; or

Properly executing a subsequent beneficiary designation form that designates a new beneficiary.

Upon the death of the owner or upon the death of the last surviving joint owner of a vehicle for which a beneficiary designation form has been properly executed, the interest of the beneficiary in the vehicle is subject to any contract of sale, assignment, or ownership or security interest to which the owner or joint owners of the vehicle were subject during their lifetime.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of this section, the designation of a beneficiary in a beneficiary designation form may not be changed or revoked by will or by any other instrument or by a change in circumstances.

The transfer on death of a vehicle pursuant to this section is a nonprobate transfer pursuant to the "Colorado Probate Code", articles 10 to 17 of title 15.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Beneficiary" means one or more specifically named persons or entities designated to receive title to a vehicle upon the death of the preceding owner or joint owners.

"Beneficiary designation form" means a form that indicates the intention of a present owner or joint owners of a vehicle to transfer ownership of the vehicle to a named beneficiary upon the death of the owner or last surviving joint owner of the vehicle.

"Division" means the division of motor vehicles in the department of revenue.

"Joint owner" means an individual who owns a vehicle with one or more other individuals as joint tenants with rights of survivorship. "Joint owner" does not include an individual who owns a vehicle with one or more other individuals as tenants in common.

"Owner" means an individual who owns a vehicle.

"Vehicle" includes any motor vehicle, motorcycle, motor home, trailer, or other item for which a certificate of title is issued by the division.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1051), ch. 47, p. 111, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

IP(1)(a), (1)(b), IP(2)(a), (2)(b), (6), and (7)(a) amended and (2.4), (2.6), (7)(c), (7)(d), (7)(e), and (7)(f) added, (HB 17-1213), ch. 184, p. 674, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1)(a)(V)(B) added by revision, (HB 18-1299), ch. 297, pp. 1813, 1815, §§ 9, 15; IP(2)(a), (2)(b), IP(3), and (4) amended, (HB 18-1299), ch. 297, p. 1813, § 9, effective July 1, 2019.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1)(a)(V)(B) provided for the repeal of subsection (1)(a)(V), effective July 1, 2019. (See L. 2018, pp. 1813, 1815.)

42-6-111. Sale to dealers - certificate need not issue.

Upon the sale or transfer to a dealer of a motor or off-highway vehicle for which a Colorado certificate of title has been issued, the dealer shall transfer and file the certificate of title to the motor or off-highway vehicle; except that, so long as the vehicle remains in the dealer's possession and at the dealer's place of business for sale and for no other purpose, the dealer need not procure or file a new certificate of title as is otherwise required in this part 1.

If a motor or off-highway vehicle dealer wishes to obtain a new certificate of title, the dealer may present the old certificate of title to the director with the fee imposed by section 42-6-137 (6), whereupon the director shall issue a new certificate of title to the dealer within one working day after application. This subsection (2) does not apply to a motor or off-highway vehicle subject to a lien.

A wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer who does not buy, sell, or own the motor vehicles transferred at auction shall disclose the identity of the wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer, the date of the auction, and the license number of the auction on a form and in a manner prescribed by the executive director. A wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer does not become an owner by reason of such disclosure nor as a result solely of the guarantee of title, guarantee of payment, or reservation of a security interest.

A wholesale motor vehicle auction dealer may buy or sell motor vehicles at wholesale in such dealer's own name and, in such instances, shall comply with the provisions of this part 1 applicable to dealers, including licensing.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2453, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(1) and (3)(a) amended, p. 1658, § 6, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 812, § 9, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2381, § 8, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-110 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-6-111 was relocated to § 42-6-113.

42-6-112. Initial registration of a vehicle - dealer responsibility to timely forward certificate of title to purchaser or holder of a chattel mortgage.

A dealer of motor or off-highway vehicles shall, within thirty days after the sale, deliver or facilitate the delivery of the certificate of title to a purchaser or the holder of a chattel mortgage on the motor or off-highway vehicle subject to section 42-6-109.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2454, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 813, § 10, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2381, § 9, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-110.5 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-6-112 was relocated to § 42-6-114.

42-6-113. New vehicles - bill of sale - certificate of title - rental businesses - rules.

Upon the sale or transfer by a dealer of a new motor or off-highway vehicle, the dealer shall, upon delivery, make, execute, and deliver to the purchaser or transferee a sufficient bill of sale and the manufacturer's certificate of origin.

The bill of sale must:

Be affirmed by a statement signed by the dealer, containing or accompanied by a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury in the second degree, as defined in section 18-8-503, C.R.S.;

Be in such form as the director may require; and

Contain, in addition to other information that the director may by rule require, the make and model of the motor or off-highway vehicle, the identification number placed upon the vehicle by the manufacturer for identification purposes, the manufacturer's suggested retail price, and the date of the sale or transfer, together with a description of any mortgage or lien on the vehicle that secures any part of the purchase price.

Upon presentation of the bill of sale and the manufacturer's certificate of origin, the director or an authorized agent shall file a new certificate of title for the vehicle described in the bill of sale. A dealer shall transfer a new motor or off-highway vehicle used by a dealer for demonstration in accordance with this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the department may, upon presentation of a manufacturer's invoice, issue a business that rents motor vehicles or special mobile machinery a certificate of title for a new motor vehicle or special mobile machinery if the business submits a signed affidavit or a title application attesting that the motor vehicle or special mobile machinery is new and has not been issued a certificate of title and that the business is entitled to be issued a certificate of title for the motor vehicle or special mobile machinery. Upon request of the department, the business shall make available a scanned image of the front of the manufacturer's certificate of origin for up to one percent of the registered vehicles of the business for any given month.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2454, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1659, § 7, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 813, § 11, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2382, § 10, effective June 5.

L. 2018:

(4) added, (HB 18-1299), ch. 297, p. 1813, § 10, effective July 1, 2019.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-111 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-6-113 was relocated to § 42-6-115.

42-6-114. Transfers by bequest, descent, or law.

Upon the transfer of ownership of a motor or off-highway vehicle by inheritance or by operation of law, as in proceedings in bankruptcy, insolvency, replevin, attachment, execution, or other judicial sale, or if the vehicle is sold to satisfy storage or repair charges or repossessed to satisfy a secured debt, the director or the authorized agent may issue, upon the surrender of any available certificate of title and presentation of such proof of ownership as the director may reasonably require or a court order, a new certificate of title on behalf of the new owner and dispose of the certificate as in other cases.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2455, § 1, effective January 1, 1995; entire section amended, p. 1041, § 21, effective July 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1659, § 8, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 814, § 12, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1513, § 77, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2382, § 11, effective June 5.

42-6-115. Furnishing bond for certificates.

If the applicant for a certificate of title to a motor or off-highway vehicle is unable to provide the director or the authorized agent with a certificate of title duly transferred to the applicant or other evidence of ownership satisfactory to the director as specified in rules established under section 42-6-104, the director or the authorized agent may file a certificate of title for the vehicle if the applicant furnishes the director or the authorized agent with a statement, in a form specified by the director, that contains:

A recital of the facts and circumstances by which the applicant acquired the ownership and possession of the vehicle;

The source of the title to the vehicle; and

Other information as the director may require to determine:

Whether any liens are attached to the motor vehicle;

The date of the liens;

The amount secured by the vehicle;

Where the liens are of public record; and

The right of the applicant to have a certificate of title filed on behalf of the applicant.

The statement specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) must contain or be accompanied by a written declaration that it is made under penalty of perjury in the second degree, as defined in section 18-8-503, C.R.S., and must accompany the application for the certificate as required in section 42-6-116.

The director or the authorized agent may maintain any evidence submitted to the director or the authorized agent in a paper or electronic version.

Upon receipt of an application by the owner of a motor or off-highway vehicle that is subject to a lien or mortgage, the authorized agent shall not issue a certificate of title unless the owner includes a signed original or signed duplicate of the mortgage or copy thereof, certified by the holder of the mortgage or the holder's agent to be a true copy of the signed original mortgage. Upon receiving the mortgage, the authorized agent shall comply with sections 42-6-121 (2), 42-6-122, and 42-6-123 concerning the lien or mortgage.

If the director or the authorized agent finds that the applicant is the same person to whom a certificate of title for the vehicle has previously been issued or filed and to whom a license was issued for the year during which the application for the certificate of title is made and that a certificate of title should be filed on behalf of the applicant, the director or authorized agent may file the certificate.

Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection (3) or section 42-12-402, the department or an authorized agent shall not file a certificate of title under this section until the applicant furnishes evidence of a savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101, C.R.S., or a good and sufficient bond with a corporate surety, to the state, in an amount fixed by the director, not less than twice the reasonable value of the vehicle determined as of the time of application. The applicant and the applicant's surety shall hold harmless any person who suffers loss or damage by reason of the filing of a certificate under this section.

If a vehicle is twenty-five years old or older, the applicant has had a certified vehicle identification number inspection performed on the vehicle, and the applicant presents a bill of sale within twenty-four months after the sale with the title application, the applicant need not furnish surety under this subsection (3). To be excepted from the surety requirement, an applicant must submit an affidavit to the department that is sworn to under penalty of perjury and that states that the required documents submitted are true and correct.

An applicant need not furnish surety under this subsection (3) for an off-highway vehicle if the applicant submits an affidavit under penalty of perjury attesting to ownership of the vehicle and if the vehicle:

Was moved to Colorado from a state not issuing certificates of title for off-highway vehicles;

Is used and held as inventory by a powersports dealer;

Was owned by an agency of the United States or another state or a political subdivision thereof;

Was owned by an agricultural producer and used strictly for agricultural purposes;

Was owned exclusively for the purpose of being operated in an organized competitive or noncompetitive event on publicly or privately owned or leased land; except that this exemption does not apply unless the agency exercising jurisdiction over the land specifically authorizes the organized competitive or noncompetitive event; or

Was used by a dealer, manufacturer, or authorized designee for an off-highway vehicle operator education or safety program.

If any person suffers loss or damage by reason of the filing of the certificate of title as provided in this section, the person has a right of action against the applicant and the surety on the applicant's bond against either of whom the person damaged may proceed independently of the other.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2455, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1660, § 9, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2003:

(2) amended and (3) added, p. 1339, § 1, effective April 22.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 814, § 13, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

(3)(b) amended, (SB 09-107), ch. 143, p. 606, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(3) amended, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 248, § 16, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (SB 12-095), ch. 112, p. 389, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

IP(1)(a) and (3)(b) amended and (1)(d) added, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2382, § 12, effective June 5.

L. 2018:

(3)(b)(I) amended, (HB 18-1299), ch. 297, p. 1814, § 11, effective July 1, 2019.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-113 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-6-115 was relocated to § 42-6-117.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 112, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.

42-6-116. Applications for filing of certificates of title - rules.

If a person who desires or who is entitled to a filing of a certificate of title to a motor or off-highway vehicle is required to apply to the director or the authorized agent, the applicant shall apply upon a form provided by the director in which appears a description of the motor or off-highway vehicle including the make and model, the manufacturer's number, and a description of any other distinguishing mark, number, or symbol placed on the vehicle by the vehicle manufacturer for identification purposes, as may be required by the director by rule adopted in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S. The application must show the name and correct address of the owner determined pursuant to section 42-6-139, a class A, class B, class C, class D, or class F vehicle owner's personal identification number as provided on a state-issued driver's license or assigned by the department, and the applicant's source of title and must include a description of all known mortgages and liens upon the motor or off-highway vehicle, the holder of the lien, the amount originally secured, and the name of the county and state if the owner holds a certificate of title or the state if the owner does not hold a certificate of title where the mortgage, lien, or financing statement is recorded or filed. The application must be verified by a statement signed by the applicant and must contain or be accompanied by a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury in the second degree, as defined in section 18-8-503, C.R.S.

Upon receipt of an application by the owner of a motor or off-highway vehicle that is subject to a lien or mortgage, the authorized agent shall not issue a certificate of title unless the owner includes a signed original or signed duplicate of the mortgage or copy thereof, certified by the holder of the mortgage or the holder's agent to be a true copy of the signed original mortgage. Upon receiving the mortgage, the authorized agent shall comply with sections 42-6-121 (2), 42-6-122, and 42-6-123 concerning the lien or mortgage.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2456, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1660, § 10, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 815, § 14, effective August 8; entire section amended, p. 694, § 2, effective January 1, 2007.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 496, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2383, § 13, effective June 5.

42-6-117. Filing of certificate.

The director or the authorized agent shall use reasonable diligence to ascertain whether the facts stated in an application and other documents submitted to the director or the authorized agent are true. In appropriate cases, the director or authorized agent may require the applicant to furnish additional information regarding ownership of the vehicle and the right to file on behalf of the applicant a certificate of title for the vehicle. The director or the authorized agent may refuse to file a certificate of title to such vehicle if the director or the authorized agent determines that the applicant is not entitled to such certificate.

No certificate of title may be filed for a vehicle required to have its vehicle identification number inspected pursuant to section 42-5-202 unless a vehicle identification number inspection form has been transmitted to the director or the authorized agent showing the number recorded from the vehicle or the number assigned to the vehicle under section 42-12-202.

At the request of the title owner, lienholder, or mortgagee, a paper copy of a filed certificate of title may be issued by the director or the authorized agent.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2456, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1661, § 11, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 816, § 15, effective August 8.

L. 2011:

(2) amended, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 248, § 17, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-115 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-6-118. Amended certificate.

If the owner of a motor or off-highway vehicle for which a Colorado certificate of title has been issued or filed replaces any part of the motor or off-highway vehicle on which appears the identification number or symbol described in the certificate of title and the identification number or symbol no longer appears on the motor or off-highway vehicle, or incorporates the part containing the identification number or symbol into another motor or off-highway vehicle, the owner shall immediately apply to the director or an authorized agent for an assigned identification number and an amended filing of a certificate of title to the vehicle.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2457, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1661, § 12, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 816, § 16, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2384, § 14, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-116 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-6-118 was relocated to § 42-6-119.

42-6-119. Certificates for vehicles registered in other states.

When a resident of the state acquires the ownership of a motor or off-highway vehicle for which a certificate of title has been issued by a state other than Colorado, the person acquiring the vehicle shall apply to the director or an authorized agent for the filing of a certificate of title as in other cases.

If a dealer acquires the ownership of a motor or off-highway vehicle by lawful means and the vehicle is titled under the laws of a state other than Colorado, the dealer need not file a Colorado certificate of title for the vehicle so long as the vehicle remains in the dealer's possession and at the dealer's place of business solely for the purpose of sale.

Upon the sale by a dealer of a motor or off-highway vehicle, the certificate of title to which was issued in a state other than Colorado, the dealer shall, within thirty days after the sale, deliver or facilitate the delivery to the purchaser the certificate of title, duly and properly endorsed or assigned to the purchaser, with a statement by the dealer containing or accompanied by a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury in the second degree, as defined in section 18-8-503, C.R.S., and setting forth the following:

That the dealer, by the execution of the affidavit, warrants to the purchaser and all persons who claim through the named purchaser that, at the time of the sale, transfer, and delivery by the dealer, the vehicle described was free and clear of all liens and mortgages except as might appear in the certificate of title;

That the vehicle is not a stolen vehicle; and

That the dealer had good, sure, and adequate title to, and full authority to sell and transfer, the vehicle.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section, if the purchaser of the vehicle completes and includes the vehicle identification number inspection form as part of the application for filing of a Colorado certificate of title to the vehicle and accompanies the application with the affidavit required by subsection (3) of this section and the duly endorsed or assigned certificate of title from a state other than Colorado, a Colorado certificate of title may be filed in the same manner as upon the sale or transfer of a motor or off-highway vehicle for which a Colorado certificate of title has been issued or filed. Upon the filing by the director or the authorized agent of the certificate of title, the director or the authorized agent may dispose of the certificate of title and shall record the certificate of title as provided in section 42-6-124.

If an applicant for the filing of a Colorado certificate of title for a vehicle for which another state has issued a certificate of title presents either a copy of a manufacturer's certificate of origin or a purchase receipt from the dealer or the out-of-state seller from whom the applicant purchased the vehicle and either document indicates that the applicant purchased the vehicle as new, the applicant need not include a vehicle identification number inspection form as part of the application.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2457, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(3) and (5) amended, p. 158, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1), (2), and (4) amended, p. 1662, § 13, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 816, § 17, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2384, § 15, effective June 5.

L. 2017:

(4) amended, (HB 17-1105), ch. 44, p. 130, § 3, effective March 16.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-118 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-6-119 was relocated to § 42-6-120.

42-6-120. Security interests upon vehicles.

Except as provided in this section and sections 42-6-130 and 42-6-148, the provisions of the "Uniform Commercial Code", title 4, C.R.S., relating to the filing, recording, releasing, renewal, priority, and extension of chattel mortgages, as defined in section 42-6-102 (9), do not apply to motor or off-highway vehicles. A mortgage or refinancing of a mortgage intended by the parties to the mortgage or refinancing to encumber or create a lien on a motor vehicle, or to be perfected as a valid lien against the rights of third persons, purchasers for value without notice, mortgagees, or creditors of the owner, must be filed for public record. The department or authorized agent shall note the fact of filing on the owner's certificate of title or bill of sale substantially in the manner provided in section 42-6-121.

This section and section 42-6-121 do not apply to a mortgage or security interest upon a vehicle or motor vehicle held for sale or lease that constitutes inventory as defined in section 4-9-102, C.R.S. The perfection of mortgages or security interests, and the rights of the parties, are governed by article 9 of title 4, C.R.S.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in the case of motor vehicles, off-highway vehicles, or trailers, a lease transaction does not create a sale or security interest solely because it permits or requires the rental price to be adjusted either upward or downward under the agreement by reference to the amount realized upon sale or other disposition of the motor vehicle, off-highway vehicle, or trailer.

The rights of a buyer, lessee, or lien creditor that arise after a mortgage attaches to a motor or off-highway vehicle and before perfection under this article are determined by section 4-9-317, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2458, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(3) added, p. 333, § 1, effective April 16.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 1662, § 14, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2001:

(2) amended, p. 1448, § 46, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 817, § 18, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 1513, § 78, effective June 1; (1) amended, p. 640, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended and (4) added, (SB 09-150), ch. 182, p. 802, § 3, effective April 22.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2385, § 16, effective June 5.

42-6-121. Filing of mortgage - rules.

The holder of a chattel mortgage on a motor or off-highway vehicle desiring to secure the rights provided for in this part 1 and to have the existence of the mortgage and the fact of the filing of the mortgage for public record noted in the filing of the certificate of title to the encumbered vehicle must present the signed original or signed duplicate of the mortgage or copy of the mortgage, certified by the holder of the mortgage or the holder's agent to be a true copy of the signed original mortgage, and the certificate of title or application for certificate of title to the vehicle encumbered to the authorized agent of the director in the county or city and county in which the mortgagor of the vehicle resides or where the vehicle is located. The holder may file either with paper documents or electronically. The mortgage or refinancing of a loan secured by a mortgage must state the name and address of the debtor; the name and address of the mortgagee or name of the mortgagee's assignee; the make, vehicle identification number, and year of manufacture of the mortgaged vehicle; and the date and amount of the loan secured by the mortgage. An owner of a motor or off-highway vehicle applying for a certificate of title under section 42-6-115, 42-6-116, or 42-6-119 is deemed to have filed under this section on behalf of the mortgage or lienholder.

Upon the receipt of the electronic, original, or duplicate mortgage or certified copy of the mortgage and certificate of title or application for certificate of title, the authorized agent, if satisfied that the vehicle described in the mortgage is the same as that described in the certificate of title or filed title, shall file within the director's authorized agent's motor and off-highway vehicle database:

Notice of the mortgage or lien, in which appears the day on which the mortgage was received for filing;

The name and address of the mortgagee named and the name and address of the holder of the mortgage, if the holder is not the named mortgagee;

The amount secured by the vehicle;

The date of the mortgage;

The day and year on which the mortgage was filed for public record; and

Any other information regarding the filing of the mortgage in the office of the director's authorized agent as may be required by the director by rule.

The director's authorized agent shall electronically transmit, when the director's authorized agent uses an electronic filing system, the certificate of title, application for certificate of title, and mortgage information to the database of the director for maintenance of a central registry of motor and off-highway vehicle title information pursuant to section 42-6-147.

A mortgage is deemed to be a signed original or a signed duplicate if the signature appearing on a certificate of title or application for certificate of title was affixed personally by the mortgagor or the mortgagor's attorney-in-fact, in ink, in carbon, or by any other means.

For purposes of liens created pursuant to section 14-10-122 (1.5), C.R.S., the lien shall contain the information set forth in this section as well as any additional information required in section 14-10-122 (1.5)(f), C.R.S.

The lien or mortgage shall be perfected pursuant to section 42-6-120 on the date all documents required by subsection (1) of this section, including, without limitation, the signed original or signed duplicate of the mortgage or a copy containing the information required by subsection (1) of this section, are received by the authorized agent and payment is tendered on the fee imposed by section 42-6-137 (2).

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2458, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1310, § 46, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1663, § 15, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 640, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1984, § 127, effective August 5; (1) amended, (HB 09-1089), ch. 196, p. 880, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2013:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2386, § 17, effective June 5.

42-6-122. Disposition of mortgages by agent - rules.

The authorized agent, upon receipt of the mortgage, shall file the mortgage in the agent's office, appropriately indexed and cross-indexed:

Under one or more of the following headings in accordance with the rules adopted by the director:

Make or vehicle identification number of motor or off-highway vehicles mortgaged;

Names of owners of mortgaged motor or off-highway vehicles as they appear on the certificates of title thereto;

The numbers of the certificates of title for motor or off-highway vehicles mortgaged;

The numbers or other identification marks assigned to registration certificates issued upon the registration of mortgaged vehicles;

Under the name of the mortgagee, the holder of the mortgage, or the owner of the vehicle; or

Under such other system as the director may devise and determine to be necessary for the efficient administration of this part 1.

All records of mortgages affecting motor or off-highway vehicles are public and may be inspected and copied, as is provided by law respecting public records affecting real property. A duly certified copy of the department's electronic record of the mortgage or lien is admissible in any civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding in this state as evidence of the existence of the mortgage or lien.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2459, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

IP(1) amended, p. 1663, § 16, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2009:

IP(1)(a) and (1)(a)(I) amended, (HB 09-1089), ch. 196, p. 880, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2387, § 18, effective June 5; (2) amended, (HB 13-1289), ch. 380, p. 2225, § 4, effective June 5.

42-6-123. Disposition after mortgaging.

After a mortgage on a motor or off-highway vehicle has been filed in the authorized agent's office, the authorized agent shall mail, deliver, or electronically transfer to the director the certificate of title or other evidence of ownership satisfactory to the director as specified in rules adopted under section 42-6-104 that the authorized agent has filed in the record. The director shall maintain completed electronic records transferred by the authorized agent. The director shall issue a new certificate of title containing, in addition to the other matters required to be set forth in certificates of title, a description of the mortgage and all information respecting the mortgage and the filing of the mortgage that appear in the certificate of the authorized agent, and the director or the director's authorized agent shall then dispose of the new certificate of title containing the notation as provided in section 42-6-124. When a motor or off-highway vehicle is subject to an electronic mortgage or lien, the certificate of title for the motor or off-highway vehicle is considered to be physically held by the mortgagee or lienholder for all legal purposes, including compliance with state or federal odometer disclosure requirements.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2459, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1664, § 17, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1289), ch. 380, p. 2225, § 5, effective June 5; entire section amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, pp. 2387, 2397, §§ 19, 42, effective June 5.